Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licenses and Examinations

§ 3290.
Eligibility for audiologist license.

To be eligible for licensure as an audiologist, an applicant shall have:

A master’s degree or equivalent in audiology or speech-language pathology from an educational institution approved by the Director, with course work completed in areas specified by rule.

Completed a supervised clinical practicum in audiology, the length and content of which shall be established by rule.

Completed a period, as determined by rule, of postgraduate professional training in audiology as approved by the Director.

Passed an examination in audiology approved by the Director, which shall include a section that is equivalent to the hearing aid dispensers examination described in section 3295 of this chapter. An audiologist who has passed this examination is not required to take the hearing aid dispensers examination required by section 3295.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2015.

§ 3291.
License required for hearing aid dispensers.

Unless a person is licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, he or she shall not:

dispense or attempt to dispense hearing aids or hold himself or herself out as being able to dispense hearing aids; or

use in connection with his or her name any letters, words, or insignia indicating or implying that he or she is a hearing aid dispenser.

A person who violates a provision of this chapter or who obtains a license by fraud or misrepresentation shall be subject to the pertinent penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127

.

An audiologist licensed pursuant to this chapter may dispense hearing aids consistent with the requirements of this chapter. Licensed audiologists are not required to obtain a separate license to dispense hearing aids.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 60

, § 1; amended

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 47, eff. July 1, 2003;

2007, No. 29

, § 47;

2015, No. 38

, § 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2015.

§ 3292.
Construction.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a person from manufacturing hearing aids or making mechanical repairs to hearing aids or from issuing warranties in connection with such manufacturing or repairs.

The licensure requirements of this chapter shall not be construed to apply to any person engaged in hearing aid dispensing as part of the academic curriculum of an accredited institution of higher education, provided that said person is directly supervised by a licensed hearing aid dispenser.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit licensed practitioners from acting within the scope of practice for their licensed field. However, such practitioners shall comply with sections 3282, 3283, and 3284 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 60

, § 1; amended

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 53.

§ 3293.
Eligibility for hearing aid dispenser license.

To be eligible for licensure as a hearing aid dispenser, an applicant shall:

have attained the age of majority; and

pass a written examination administered by the Director under section 3295 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 60

, § 1; amended

2015, No. 38

, § 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2015.

§ 3294.
Application for licensure as hearing aid dispenser.

An application for licensure as a hearing aid dispenser shall be made on a form furnished by the Director and shall be accompanied by the application and examination fees and evidence of eligibility as requested by the Director.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 60

, § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

2015, No. 38

, § 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2015.

§ 3295.
Examination for licensure as hearing aid dispenser.

Examinations shall be administered in the manner and places designated by the Director.

The examination shall cover the following: the basic physics of sound, anatomy, and physiology of the ear, structure and function of hearing aids, pure tone audiometry, voice and recorded speech audiometry, interpretation of audiograms as related to hearing aid usage, selection and adaptation of hearing aids, counseling people who are hard of hearing in the appropriate use of hearing aids, identifying situations in which referrals to a physician are appropriate, knowledge of medical and rehabilitation facilities for people who are hard of hearing in this State, and State and federal laws relating to dispensing hearing aids and other areas of knowledge determined by the Director to be necessary.

If the applicant passes the examination and meets the other requirements set forth in this chapter, the applicant shall receive a license upon payment of the license fee.

If an applicant fails the examination, the applicant may retake the examination on one or more occasions upon payment of the examination fee.

The Director shall establish by rule fixed criteria for passing the examination that shall apply to all persons taking the examination.

The Director may waive the examination requirement if the applicant is a hearing aid dispenser regulated under the laws of another state who is in good standing to dispense hearing aids in that state and, in the opinion of the Director, the standards and qualifications required for regulation of hearing aid dispensers in that state are currently at least equal to those required by this chapter.

Licensing standards and procedures shall be fair and reasonable and shall be designed and implemented to measure and reasonably ensure that all applicants are granted licensure if they demonstrate that they possess the minimal occupational qualifications that are consistent with public health, safety, and welfare. They shall not be designed or implemented for the purpose of limiting the number or types of licensees.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 60

, § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 179;

2015, No. 38

, § 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2015.

§ 3295a.
Temporary licensure of hearing aid dispenser without examination.

A temporary license may be issued to a person who applies for the first time to practice as a hearing aid dispenser under section 3293 of this chapter, is employed by a licensed hearing aid dispenser, and satisfies the provisions of subdivision (1) of that section.

A temporary license allows a person to practice as a hearing aid dispenser while directly supervised by a hearing aid dispenser licensed under section 3295 of this chapter until he or she takes the next examination provided by the Director and a determination is made of his or her qualifications to practice in this State.
(b) (1) A temporary license allows a person to practice as a hearing aid dispenser while directly supervised by a hearing aid dispenser licensed under section 3295 of this chapter until he or she takes the next examination provided by the Director and a determination is made of his or her qualifications to practice in this State.

The supervising hearing aid dispenser shall personally observe the temporary licensee while conducting and interpreting hearing tests and making earmolds or impressions, for a period of two months following issuance of a license under this section or until the license expires, whichever occurs first.

Temporary licenses shall be issued on payment of the specified fee and shall remain in force no longer than 60 days following examination and shall not be extended except for good and exceptional cause shown by the applicant. Not more than one temporary license may be issued to the same person. An extension shall not be granted to an applicant who fails the examination.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 54; amended

2015, No. 38

, § 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2015.

§ 3296.
Renewals and reinstatement for audiologists and hearing aid dispensers.

Licenses shall be renewed every two years upon payment of the renewal fee.

Upon receipt of the completed form and the renewal fee, the Director shall issue a new license.

The Director may make such rules as may be reasonably necessary for the protection of the public to ensure that an applicant for reinstatement is professionally qualified.

As a condition of renewal, the Director may require that licensees establish that they have satisfied continuing education requirements established by the Director, by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 60

, § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

2015, No. 38

, § 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2015.

§ 3297.
Repealed. 1997, No. 59, § 65(5), eff. June 30, 1997.

§ 3298.
Repealed. 2015, No. 38, § 34, eff. September 1, 2015.